Utah statutes.
63C-14-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Commission" means the Federal Funds Commission created in Section 63C-14-201.

(2)  "Federal issue" means a matter relating to the federal government's dealings with the state, including a matter described in Subsection 63C-14-301(1).



Enacted by Chapter 62, 2013 General Session

